District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1206.07

Nurse-practitioner practice.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 607, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(v), 42 DCR 457

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3306.7.